Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1805
Mandated project, defined.

Mandated project means the construction, retrofitting, rebuilding, acquisition, or installation of any equipment, device, structure, improvement, process, facility, technology, or other property owned, licensed, or controlled by a public entity or operated for the benefit of a public entity through a power participation or purchase agreement, either within or outside the State of Nebraska, and used in connection with a new or existing facility related to electrical power generation, transmission, or distribution, which construction, retrofitting, rebuilding, acquisition, or installation is undertaken to satisfy a mandate, including, but not limited to, any equipment, device, structure, improvement, process, facility, technology, or other property related to environmental pollution control, safety, or useful life extension of an existing plant or facility.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 5.